Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB802.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 100.123 is amended to read as follows:
At any time, the legislative bodies of the cities and counties comprising two (2) or more
adjacent planning units whose combined territory form a logical functional area, or
portion thereof, by reasons of physical, economic, or social features may enter into an
agreement to form a regional planning unit. The agreement for a[such] regional unit may
permit the continuation of any of the joint units and their planning commissions, or may
serve to replace them. If any joint units are to continue in operation, the agreement shall
state clearly the division or assignment of functions between the regional and joint units.
The[Such] regional units[,] shall be financed by the legislative parties in accordance with
the agreement.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/1/2026 10:47 AM Jacketed